Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF5303.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin [484.721] COURT RECORD; HUMAN OVERSIGHT. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Definitions. new text end new text begin (a) For purposes of this section, the following terms have the meanings given. new text end new text begin (b) "Artificial intelligence-based tool" means a system, algorithm, or software that uses artificial intelligence, including machine learning, natural language processing, large language models, language generation, or similar technologies to generate, analyze, or transcribe audio, video, or text data for the purpose of creating an official verbatim court record. new text end new text begin (c) "Court" means the supreme court and any district or appellate court in the state required to maintain an official verbatim court record under Minnesota Statutes or court rules. new text end new text begin (d) "Official verbatim court record" means the official transcript or recording of court proceedings, including hearings, trials, or other court proceedings, as required under Minnesota Statutes, including but not limited to section 484.72, and court rules. new text end new text begin (e) "Qualified court reporter" means a competent stenographer who meets the minimum qualifications promulgated by the supreme court. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Requirement for human oversight. new text end new text begin (a) The recommendations, predictions, or outputs provided by an artificial intelligence-based tool must not be the sole basis for the creation of an official verbatim court record. new text end new text begin (b) An artificial intelligence-based tool used in the creation of an official verbatim court record must have human oversight by a qualified court reporter. Human oversight includes: new text end new text begin (1) real-time monitoring or post-process review of the artificial intelligence-generated output, transcript, or recording to ensure accuracy and completeness; new text end new text begin (2) verification that the output, transcript, or recording accurately reflects verbatim the spoken words, context, and intent of the court proceedings; and new text end new text begin (3) certification by the qualified court reporter that the official verbatim court record complies with all applicable statutes, court rules, and standards of accuracy. new text end new text begin (c) The supreme court must maintain or establish policies governing human oversight by qualified court reporters over the creation of official verbatim court records using artificial intelligence-based tools before using artificial intelligence-based tools to assist in the creation of official verbatim court records. new text end new text begin (d) In the event of a discrepancy between an artificial intelligence-generated output, transcript, or recording and the human-verified official verbatim court record, the human-verified record is the official court record. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Certification and documentation. new text end new text begin (a) An official verbatim court record created with the assistance of an artificial intelligence-based tool must include a certification by a qualified court reporter attesting to the accuracy of the record, the performance of human oversight, and the type and name of the artificial intelligence-based tool used. new text end new text begin (b) The court must maintain documentation of the human oversight process, including the identity of the individual providing oversight and the methods used to verify the accuracy of the artificial intelligence-generated output, for a period consistent with record retention policies under section 138.17, or as otherwise prescribed by court rules. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Exceptions. new text end new text begin This section does not apply to unofficial recordings or transcripts created for purposes other than the official verbatim court record if the recordings or transcripts are clearly labeled as unofficial and are not submitted as part of the official court record. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective January 1, 2027, and applies to official verbatim court records created on or after that date. new text end